Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 8 Close Pursuit

12-8-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Act on Close Pursuit.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2383, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 628, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

12-8-1

.

12-8-2.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

“Felony” includes any misdemeanor involving moral turpitude.

“State” includes the District of Columbia.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2383, §§ 4, 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 628, §§ 4, 5; P.L. 1950, ch. 2485, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-8-2

.

12-8-3.
Arrest after close pursuit by officers from other states.

Any member of a duly organized state, county or municipal peace unit of another state of the United States who enters this state in close pursuit and continues within this state in that close pursuit of a person in order to arrest him or her on the ground that he or she has committed a felony in the other state shall have the same authority to arrest and hold in custody the person, as members of a duly organized state, county, or municipal peace unit of this state have to arrest and hold in custody a person on the ground that he or she has committed a felony in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2383, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 628, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-8-3

.

12-8-4.
Arrests otherwise unlawful.

Section

12-8-3

shall not be construed so as to make unlawful any arrest in this state which would otherwise be lawful.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2383, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 628, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

12-8-4

.

12-8-5.
Commitment or discharge of person arrested.

If an arrest is made in this state by an officer of another state in accordance with the provisions of §

12-8-3

, he or she shall without unnecessary delay take the person arrested before the district court for the division in which the arrest was made and the court shall conduct a hearing for the purpose of determining the lawfulness of the arrest. If the judge determines that the arrest was lawful, he or she shall commit the person arrested to await for a reasonable time the issuance of an extradition warrant by the governor of this state. If the judge determines that the arrest was unlawful he shall discharge the person arrested.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2383, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 628, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-8-5

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 18.

12-8-6.
Severability.

If any part of this chapter is for any reason declared void, it is declared to be the intent of this chapter that its invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2383, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 628, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

12-8-6

.